pl: Przewodnik edukacyjny w zestawie: Zeszyt ćwiczeń; Dostęp do cyfrowej aplikacji / treści; Tylko instrukcja obsługi; Brak przewodnika w zestawie; Karty informacyjne o planecie; Plakat/mapa w zestawie; Scenariusz lekcji dla nauczyciela; Inne
ja: 教育ガイド付き: アクティビティワークブック; デジタルアプリ/コンテンツへのアクセス; 取扱説明書のみ; ガイドなし; 地球のファクトカード; ポスター/地図（同梱）; 教師用レッスンプラン; その他
hu: Mellékelt oktatási útmutató: Foglalkoztató füzet; Digitális alkalmazás/tartalom-hozzáférés; Csak használati útmutató; Útmutató nélkül; Bolygós kártyák; Poszterrel/térképpel; Tanári óratervezet; Egyéb
tr: Eğitim kılavuzu dahildir: Etkinlik çalışma kitabı; Dijital uygulama/içerik erişimi; Sadece kullanım kılavuzu; Kılavuz dahil değil; Gezegen bilgi kartları; Poster/harita dâhil; Öğretmen ders planı; Diğer
ru: Учебное руководство в комплекте: Рабочая тетрадь; Доступ к цифровому приложению/контенту; Только руководство пользователя; Без руководства в комплекте; Карточки с фактами о планете; В комплекте постер/карта; План урока для учителя; Другое
fr: Guide pédagogique inclus: Cahier d’activités; Accès à l’application/contenu numérique; Manuel d’instructions uniquement; Aucun guide inclus; Fiches d’information Planet; Affiche/carte incluse; Plan de cours pour enseignant; Autre
sv: Pedagogisk guide ingår: Aktivitetsbok; Digital app/innehållsåtkomst; Endast bruksanvisning; Ingen guide ingår; Faktakort om planeter; Affisch/karta ingår; Lektionsplanering för lärare; Övrigt
el: Περιλαμβάνεται εκπαιδευτικός οδηγός: Τετράδιο δραστηριοτήτων; Πρόσβαση σε ψηφιακή εφαρμογή/περιεχόμενο; Μόνο εγχειρίδιο οδηγιών; Δεν περιλαμβάνεται οδηγός; Κάρτες γεγονότων για τον πλανήτη; Περιλαμβάνεται αφίσα/χάρτης; Σχέδιο μαθήματος εκπαιδευτικού; Άλλο
pt-BR: Guia educativo incluído: Caderno de atividades; Acesso a conteúdo/aplicativo digital; Apenas manual de instruções; Nenhum guia incluído; Cartões de curiosidades sobre o planeta; Pôster/mapa incluído; Plano de aula para professores; Outro
sk-SK: Zahŕňa vzdelávacieho sprievodcu: Pracovný zošit s aktivitami; Prístup k digitálnej aplikácii/obsahu; Iba návod na použitie; Bez sprievodcu; Karty s faktami o planétach; Súčasťou je plagát/mapa; Plán vyučovacej hodiny; Iné
fi: Mukana tuleva koulutusopas: Tehtäväkirja; Digitaalinen sovellus / sisältöpääsy; Vain käyttöopas; Ei sisällä opasta; Planeettatietokortit; Sisältää julisteen/kartan; Opettajan tuntisuunnitelma; Muu
da: Uddannelsesvejledning, der er inkluderet: Aktivitetsarbejdsbog; Adgang til digital app/indhold; Kun brugsanvisning; Ingen guide medfølger; Planetfaktakort; Plakat/kort medfølger; Lektionsplan for underviser; Andet
th: มีคู่มือการเรียนรู้รวมอยู่ด้วย: สมุดกิจกรรม; สิทธิ์การเข้าถึงแอป/เนื้อหาดิจิทัล; คู่มือการใช้งานเท่านั้น; ไม่มีคู่มือ; การ์ดความรู้เกี่ยวกับโลก; มีโปสเตอร์/แผนที่; แผนการสอนสำหรับครู; อื่นๆ
cs: Součástí je výuková příručka: Pracovní sešit; Přístup do digitální aplikace / k obsahu; Pouze návod k použití; Bez průvodce; Karty s fakty o planetách; Plakát/mapa; Plán hodiny pro učitele; Ostatní
zh-TW: 附教育指南: 活動練習本; 數位應用程式/內容存取權限; 僅含使用手冊; 不含指南; 行星知識圖卡; 含海報/地圖; 教師教案; 其他
sl-SI: Priložen izobraževalni vodnik: Delovni zvezek; Digitalna aplikacija/dostop do vsebine; Samo priročnik z navodili; Brez priloženega vodnika; Kartice z dejstvi o planetih; Priložen plakat/zemljevid; Učni načrt za učitelje; Drugo
lt-LT: Įtrauktas edukacinis vadovas: Užduočių sąsiuvinis; Skaitmeninės programėlės / turinio prieiga; Tik naudojimo instrukcija; Vadovas nepridedamas; Planetų faktų kortelės; Pridedamas plakatas / žemėlapis; Mokytojo pamokos planas; Kita
nl: Educatieve gids inbegrepen: Activiteitenboek; Toegang tot digitale app/content; Alleen instructiehandleiding; Geen gids inbegrepen; Feitenkaarten over de planeet; Inclusief poster/kaart; Lesplan voor docent; Anders
hr-HR: Uključen edukativni vodič: Radna bilježnica s aktivnostima; Pristup digitalnoj aplikaciji/sadržaju; Samo priručnik s uputama; Vodič nije uključen; Kartice sa činjenicama o planetima; Uključen plakat/karta; Nastavni plan za učitelje; Ostalo
nb: Pedagogisk guide inkludert: Aktivitetsbok; Tilgang til digital app/innhold; Kun bruksanvisning; Ingen guide inkludert; Planet-faktakort; Plakat/kart inkludert; Undervisningsopplegg for lærere; Annet
es: Guía educativa incluida: Libro de actividades; Acceso a aplicación/contenido digital; Solo manual de instrucciones; No se incluye guía; Tarjetas de datos del planeta; Póster/mapa incluido; Plan de clases para profesores; Otro
zh-CN: 配套教学指导材料: 活动练习册; 数字应用/内容访问权限; 仅含说明书; 不含指南; 星球科普卡; 包含海报/地图; 教师教案; 其他
bg-BG: Включено образователно ръководство: Работна тетрадка с упражнения; Достъп до дигитално приложение/съдържание; Само ръководство с инструкции; Не е включено ръководство; Карти с факти за планетите; Включен плакат/карта; План за урок за учители; Друго
it: Guida didattica inclusa: Quaderno delle attività; Accesso all'app/ai contenuti digitali; Solo manuale di istruzioni; Nessuna guida inclusa; Schede informative sul pianeta; Poster/mappa inclusi; Piano delle lezioni per insegnanti; Altro
pt-PT: Guia educativo incluído: Caderno de atividades; Acesso a app/conteúdos digitais; Apenas manual de instruções; Nenhum guia incluído; Cartões de factos do planeta; Póster/mapa incluído; Plano de aula do professor; Outro
ro-RO: Ghid educațional inclus: Caiet de activități; Acces la aplicație digitală/conținut; Doar manual de instrucțiuni; Fără ghid inclus; Cartonașe cu informații despre planete; Poster/hartă inclusă; Plan de lecție pentru profesori; Altele
de: Enthaltener Lernleitfaden: Arbeitsheft; Zugang zu digitaler App/Inhalten; Nur Bedienungsanleitung; Keine Anleitung inklusive; Planeten-Faktenkarten; Poster/Karte inbegriffen; Unterrichtsplan für Lehrkräfte; Sonstige
ko: 교육용 가이드 포함: 활동 워크북; 디지털 앱/콘텐츠 이용권; 사용 설명서 전용; 가이드 미포함; 플래닛 팩트 카드; 포스터/지도 포함; 교사용 수업 계획서; 기타
en: Educational guide included: Activity workbook; Digital app/content access; Instruction manual only; No guide included; Planet fact cards; Poster/map included; Teacher lesson plan; Other
vi: Tài liệu hướng dẫn giáo dục đi kèm: Sách bài tập thực hành; Truy cập nội dung/ứng dụng kỹ thuật số; Chỉ có sổ tay hướng dẫn; Không bao gồm tài liệu hướng dẫn; Thẻ thông tin hành tinh; Bao gồm áp phích/bản đồ; Giáo án cho giáo viên; Khác